Utah statutes.
63A-3-401.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Utah Transparency Advisory Board created under Section
63A-3-403.
(2)  "Division" means the Division of Finance of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(3)  "Participating local entity" means each of the following local entities,
if the entity meets the size or budget thresholds established by the rules
authorized under Subsection 63A-3-404(2)(a):
(a)  a county;
(b)  a municipality;
(c)  a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government
Entities - Local Districts;
(d)  a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service
District Act;
(e)  a school district; and
(f)  a charter school.
(4)  "Participating state entity" means the state of Utah, including its
executive, legislative, and judicial branches, its departments, divisions,
agencies, boards, commissions, councils, committees, and institutions.
(5)  "Public financial information" means records that are required to be made
available on the Utah Public Finance Website or a participating local entity's
website as required by this part and as the term is defined by rule under
Section 63A-3-404.
